Louisiana, session 2026, SB155.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1077.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1077.6. Coverage for dental services for cancer patients
A.(1) Except as provided in Subsections B and C of this Section, an
insurer offering a health coverage plan in this state shall provide coverage for
evaluation, imaging, clinical examination, and dental extractions that are
medically necessary to reduce the risk of infection, eliminate infection, or treat
tooth loss or decay as part of a pre-cancer treatment screening for an insured
who has been diagnosed with cancer.
(2) The dental services shall be covered when performed as part of a pre-
treatment medical clearance protocol for insureds scheduled to undergo cancer
treatment.
B. A healthcare insurer is not required to provide coverage for routine
preventive dental care, including cleaning and sealants.
C. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to a plan providing
coverage for excepted benefits as defined in R.S. 22:1061, limited benefit health
insurance plans, and short-term policies that have a term of less than twelve
months.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any new policy, contract,
program, or health coverage plan issued on or after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract,
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 155 ENROLLED
or plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the provisions of this
Act on or before the renewal date thereof, but in no event later than January 1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.